Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
SUBPART 1
VOLUNTARY DISSOLUTION

7-56-701. Authorization of dissolution before issuance of memberships.

If a cooperative has not yet issued memberships, a majority of its directors or, if the initial directors designated in the articles have not met or if not designated in the articles have not been elected, a majority of its incorporators, may authorize the dissolution of the cooperative.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 522, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-55-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-702. Authorization of dissolution after issuance of memberships.

After memberships have been issued, dissolution of a cooperative may be authorized in the following manner:

The board, by a two-thirds majority vote of all its members, shall first adopt a resolution recommending dissolution that conforms to the requirements of paragraph (c) of this subsection (1);

The board shall submit the resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to the members;

The resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall state the reasons why the termination of the affairs of the cooperative is deemed advisable, the time by which it should be accomplished, whether or not the board may revoke dissolution, and the names of three persons and two alternates to act as trustees in liquidation who shall have all the powers of the board to do all things they deem necessary for the efficient distribution of claims to creditors, in liquidation and termination of the affairs of the cooperative, including the sale of all or substantially all of the cooperative's property as they deem necessary if the resolution also provides for a sale of the property. Such trustees and alternates need not be members of the cooperative. Any vacancies in the trusteeship shall be first filled by the designated alternates and then may be filled by such persons as may be designated by the remaining trustees.

The board may condition the effectiveness of the dissolution on any basis.

The cooperative shall give notice to each member of the regular or special meeting at which the resolution to dissolve will be voted upon. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposal to dissolve the cooperative. The notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the proposal or a summary thereof, including a description of the proposed distribution of the cooperative's assets and, if voting by mail is permitted, with a mail ballot attached to it.

The proposal to dissolve shall be approved by a two-thirds majority vote of the members present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1) at a regular or special meeting called for such purpose. A cooperative shall not permit proportional voting to apply to a vote of members on a resolution to dissolve pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 522, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(a) amended, p. 613, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 224, § 10, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-55-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-703. Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the cooperative may dissolve by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of dissolution stating:

The domestic entity name of the cooperative;

The principal office address of the cooperative's principal office; and

That the cooperative is dissolved.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1418, § 59, effective July 1, 2004.)

A cooperative is dissolved upon the effective date of its filed articles of dissolution.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2232, § 101, effective July 1, 2004.)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 523, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1819, § 29, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, p. 1683, § 27, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), and (3) amended, p. 2232, § 101, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1418, § 59, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-55-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-704. Revocation of dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 524, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(3) and (4) amended, p. 1819, § 30, effective July 1; IP(3) and (4) amended, p. 1684, § 28, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(3), (3)(a), and (4) amended and (5) added, p. 2232, § 102, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1418, § 60, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 7-55-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-705. Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved cooperative continues its existence but may not carry on any business except as is appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its assets that will not be distributed in kind to its members or equity holders;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

Distributing its remaining assets among its members or equity holders according to their interests; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Unless otherwise stated in the articles or bylaws, the assets shall be used to pay, in the following order:

Liquidation expenses, including reasonable payment and reimbursement for the time and expenses of the trustees in liquidation and their consultants;

All debts and liabilities according to their respective priorities;

Amounts invested in the cooperative that have a specific preference in liquidation over other amounts invested in the cooperative;

Without priority and on a pro rata basis, amounts invested in the cooperative, whether as membership fees, common stock, or otherwise, which are required by the cooperative to be invested in order for a person to be a member or to be subject to per unit retains or be entitled to participate in the allocation of net margins on terms and conditions established in the cooperative's bylaws or by the cooperative's board;

Without priority and on a pro rata basis, retained patronage, per unit retains, other amounts withheld from or allocated to a patron of the cooperative, or any direct contributions to the capital of the cooperative not described in paragraph (d) of this subsection (2), all as shown on the books and records of the cooperative;

Any remaining assets, including reserves, if any, shall be distributed among such members of the cooperative, as shown in the records of the cooperative, without priority and on a pro rata basis, as shall be practicable as determined by the trustees in liquidation. In making their determination, the trustees in liquidation may limit those persons entitled to share in the distribution to persons entitled to share in the allocation of the cooperative's net margins during a limited specified period of time.

With respect to subsections (2)(e) and (2)(f) of this section, the amounts to be distributed shall be paid to the persons entitled to them as promptly as reasonably possible after the filing of the articles of dissolution by the secretary of state, but in no event shall the distributions be made later than seven years following the filing of the articles of dissolution by the secretary of state unless distribution is prevented by circumstances beyond the control of the trustees in liquidation.

Dissolution of a cooperative does not:

Transfer title to the cooperative's property;

Prevent transfer of its memberships or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the cooperative's membership, stock, or other equity transfer records;

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those otherwise applicable to them prior to dissolution;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board or members; change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers, or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws or its articles;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the cooperative in its cooperative name; or

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the cooperative on the effective date of dissolution.

A dissolved cooperative may dispose of claims against it pursuant to sections 7-90-911 and 7-90-912.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 525, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(4) added, p. 849, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-55-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-706. Disposition of known claims by notification. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 526, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 7-55-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-707. Disposition of claims by publication. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 527, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2233, § 103, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 7-55-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-708. Enforcement of claims against dissolved cooperative. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 528, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 7-55-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-709. Service on dissolved cooperative - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 528, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(4) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

(1) This section was similar to former § 7-55-114 as it existed prior to 1996.

(2) Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)